Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2089
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Board of directors; meetings.

(1) The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means shall be deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 89.